Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-690
Taxation; levy; money and credits; surrender to Tax Commissioner.

Any car line company in possession of any money and credits upon which levy has been made shall, upon demand of the Tax Commissioner or his or her designated agent, surrender the same to the Tax Commissioner or his or her designated agent. If any such car line company fails or refuses to surrender the money and credits in accordance with the requirements of this section, such car line company shall be liable to the State of Nebraska in a sum equal to the value of the money and credits not so surrendered but not exceeding the amount of the taxes, interest, and penalties for the collection of which such levy has been made.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 75;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 215;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 84;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 41.